Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2739
Effect of registration in beneficiary form.

The designation of a TOD or POD beneficiary on a registration in beneficiary form has no effect on ownership until the owner's death. A registration of a security in beneficiary form may be canceled or changed at any time by the sole owner or all then surviving owners without the consent of the beneficiary.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 25.